Maine, session 132, LD282.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §2405, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 307, §2, is amended
to read:
10. Limit on number of public charter schools. No more than 10 public charter
schools may operate at any time. Any time the cap is reached, the commissioner may not
accept further registrations from the commission or from local school boards and
collaboratives of local school boards cap increases by one.